Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1580XC (1) 91 as/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 803.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. a. Except as otherwise provided in this 3 section, if the county in which an offense was committed cannot 4 be readily determined, trial of the offense shall be held in 5 the county of residence of the victim. 6 b. If there is no victim, the victim is not a resident 7 of this state, or the residence of the victim cannot be 8 established, trial of the offense shall be held in the county 9 of residence of the person charged with the offense. 10 c. If the victim is not a natural person, venue for trial 11 of the offense is proper in any county where the victim has a 12 physical presence. 13 d. If there is more than one victim, trial of the offenses 14 may be held in any county in which a victim resides with the 15 county of residence of a natural person taking priority over 16 the county of residence of other victims. 17